Nevada, session 83, SB448.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Workforce Connections for a program to provide
education, training and employment opportunities and related wrap-
around services to youth who are 16 years of age or older but less
than 25 years of age and who are not enrolled in an educational
program and are not employed the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $7,500,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $7,500,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred,
-
*SB448*

– 2 –
and must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB448*